Florida, session 2026, SB864.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (4) is added to section 381.9312, 14 Florida Statutes, to read: 15 381.9312âUterine fibroid research database; education and 16 public awareness.â 17 (4)âPUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.âAll records and personal 18 identifying information relating to women diagnosed with or 19 treated for uterine fibroids which is submitted to the 20 department under this section are confidential and exempt from 21 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 22 This subsection is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 23 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 24 October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 25 reenactment by the Legislature. 26 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 27 necessity to make all records and personal identifying 28 information relating to women diagnosed with or treated for 29 uterine fibroids which is submitted to the Department of Health 30 under s. 381.9312, Florida Statutes, confidential and exempt 31 from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of 32 the State Constitution. The Department of Health is unable to 33 effectively implement the legislative purpose of the uterine 34 fibroid research database, created under s. 381.9312, Florida 35 Statutes, without access to these records and information, which 36 include personal medical information, the disclosure of which 37 would violate federal patient privacy laws, including the Health 38 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. Therefore, 39 the Legislature finds that it is a public necessity to make such 40 records and information held by the department confidential and 41 exempt to protect the privacy rights of women diagnosed with and 42 treated for uterine fibroids in this state and promote the 43 effective administration of the departmentâs epidemiological 44 research and tracking activities. 45 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 46 SB 196 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 47 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 48 thereof and becomes a law.